Massachusetts, session 194th, H200.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 1D the
following section:-
Section 1D. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Deaf”, any individual that is Deaf, Hard of Hearing, DeafBlind or DeafDisabled.
“DeafDisabled”, any individual who is Deaf with special needs.
“Qualified Professionals”, any professional working with a Deaf child who has
demonstrated knowledge of language acquisition in Deaf children, fluency in American Sign
Language as measured by the American Sign Language Proficiency Interview and has
of 6

credentials in their specialized profession. American Sign Language interpreters must have a K-
12 Certification through the Educational Interpreters Performance Assessment or an equivalent
certification as determined between the commission for the deaf and hard of hearing and the
department of elementary and secondary education.
“Language Access”, a process of providing tools to a Deaf child to acquire a language
and allows a Deaf child to access a free and appropriate education and participate in everyday
activities.
“Language Acquisition”, a process by which a Deaf child acquires the capacity to
perceive and comprehend language, as well as to produce and use words and sentences to
communicate.
“Language modality”, using language in one or other modes, including, signed, spoken or
written language. Language modality helps to facilitate language development, communication,
and learning.
(b) The commonwealth recognizes that deaf children, Hard of Hearing, DeafBlind or
DeafDisabled have the same potential and rights as all children to receive a free and appropriate
public education and to become independent and self-actualized citizens. The commonwealth
acknowledges the need for early screening and access to language services and instruction.
(c) There shall be a policy known as the Deaf Children’s Bill of Rights that shall contain,
at a minimum, the following:
(1) Deaf children have the right to appropriate screening and assessments of hearing and
vision capabilities by qualified professionals proficient in American Sign Language, English and
of 6

educational needs of deaf children and to acquire American Sign Language and English at the
earliest possible age or at time of identification and assessment throughout the educational
process at regular intervals;
(2) Deaf children shall receive individualized and appropriate early language access
services by qualified providers that shall include support for the acquisition of language as early
as possible and assessments at regular intervals every 3 months prior to kindergarten and every 3
years until the child reaches age 22. Assessments shall utilize age-appropriate benchmarks and
identify current language levels and educational planning to support progress. Failure to show
progress shall be subject to state agency intervention to ensure measures are taken to remediate
the issue;
(3) all educational entities from pre-kindergarten through grade 12 shall ensure that
parents or guardians of deaf children are entitled to full and informed participation in the
development of their child’s educational plans and the determination of educational placement
based on their child’s educational and language needs and the capacity of the program to meet
those needs. Furthermore, the child’s parents or guardian may request enrollment in a school for
deaf students;
(4) Deaf children shall be entitled to placement in a school that is best suited to each
child's individual needs including, but not limited to, language levels, social, emotional and
cultural needs, with consideration for the child's age, degree of hearing loss, academic level,
language needs, style of learning, motivational level and amount of family support. A language
access plan shall be required as a part of the student’s Individualized family service plan,
Individualized education program, or individual accommodation plan;
of 6

(5) all educational entities from pre-kindergarten through grade 12 shall provide
placement options for deaf children across a full spectrum of educational programs and shall
inform parents about all school choices including the local school for the deaf;
(6) all educational entities from pre-kindergarten through grade 12 shall provide enrolled
deaf children access to full support services by qualified professionals in their educational
settings. The department of elementary and secondary education shall work with educational
entities to ensure technical assistance is available to support local education agencies and other
programs in meeting the needs of Deaf students;
(7) Deaf children have the right to direct instruction. If that is not possible, all educational
entities from pre-kindergarten through grade 12 shall provide enrolled deaf children access to
qualified teachers, interpreters and resource personnel who are fluent in both American Sign
Language and English along with the child’s home language if different. Qualified providers
should include but not be limited to teachers of Deaf students, paraprofessionals, language
translators and Sign Language Interpreters, school psychologists, speech and language
pathologists, American Sign Language Specialists and counselors;
(8) Deaf children who are under the age of 7 and who do not receive direct instruction
shall have a certified or state approved deaf interpreter in the classroom to enhance language
acquisition;
(9) Deaf children shall have full access to all programs and information in their
educational placements, including but not limited to extracurricular activities, recess, lunch,
media showings and public announcements;
of 6

(10) Deaf children shall have opportunities to meet and associate with adult role models
who are Deaf and learn about identity, self-advocacy and leadership skills;
(11) Deaf children shall have opportunities to meet and associate with Deaf peers that are
around the same age or have similar academic abilities during school hours and school-
sponsored activities, including those occurring outside regular school hours;
(12) professionals in related fields, including, but not limited to medicine and education,
working with Deaf children shall be responsible for providing full information to the children’s
families on medical, ethical, cultural and linguistic issues including the benefits, risks and
limitations of technology, cochlear implant or bone anchored hearing aid implant surgery,
hearing aids and language acquisition and deprivation;
(13) Deaf children are entitled to the involvement and participation of Deaf adults, if
requested, in any meeting with parents and the school district in determining the extent, content
and purpose of all programs that affect their education;
(14) Deaf children are entitled to have direct access to mental health services and
supporting services from qualified providers who are culturally and linguistically competent and
who are fluent in American Sign Language;
(15) the commission for the deaf and hard of hearing shall track each Deaf child from
birth or identification until age 22. Each Deaf child shall have an individualized family service
plan, individualized education program or 504 plan based on that child’s unique language and
learning needs;
of 6

(16) If a local education agency, school entity or educational institution or early
Intervention program is found to be in violation of this section, where the child is shown to be
language deprived or lacking in development, such education provider may be subject to an
intervention by the department of elementary and secondary education. Each state agency shall
aggregate and publish results of any data from qualified providers related to the enforcement of
this section on an annual basis.
of 6